Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 5
WARRANTS AND BONDS FOR PERSONS
ILLEGALLY IN THE COUNTRY

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting this part 5, see section 1 of chapter 397, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

16-3-501. Warrants issued for persons illegally in the country.

If a person has posted a bond in a criminal case, at any stage of a criminal proceeding, and the person is released to the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency, the court shall issue a warrant commanding the arrest of the person when contacted anywhere within the United States and shall set the amount of the bond on the warrant. The warrant shall be entered in the Colorado crime information center and the national crime information center databases. The criminal case shall remain active for an indefinite period of time; except that the case may be dismissed upon a motion by the district attorney.

A bond issued pursuant to this section shall include all known aliases for the person and the person's date of birth.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1770, § 2, effective June 1.

16-3-502. No dismissal of cases against persons illegally in the country.

A court shall not dismiss criminal charges against a person because the person has been removed or is facing removal from the United States prior to a conviction or other disposition of all criminal charges against the person; except that the court may dismiss the criminal charges upon a motion of the district attorney.

A court shall not dismiss criminal charges against a person who has been convicted or pled guilty to a crime because the person has been removed or is facing removal from the United States. The defendant shall serve his or her sentence and pay all restitution prior to removal.

If the provisions of part 3 of article 4.1 of title 24, C.R.S., apply, the victim shall be consulted pursuant to the provisions of sections 24-4.1-302.5 and 24-4.1-303, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1771, § 2, effective June 1.

16-3-503. Bonds for persons with immigration-related issues.

On and after June 6, 2017, a law enforcement agency holding a defendant charged with a criminal offense shall not notify the defendant's bail bonding agent or a noncompensated surety before the bond is posted that his or her bond or fees may be forfeited if the defendant is removed from the country. On and after June 6, 2017, a law enforcement officer shall no longer ask a defendant or a person other than a bail bonding agent to execute a waiver prior to posting a bond for a person charged with a criminal offense that states that he or she understands that the bond or fees shall be forfeited if the defendant is removed from the country. A bail bonding agent shall not communicate to a defendant that his or her bond or fees shall be forfeited if the defendant is removed from the country.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part added, p. 1771, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 923, § 2, effective July 1; (3)(n) amended, p. 1884, § 21, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 12-1266), ch. 280, p. 1525, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 17-1369), ch. 379, p. 1950, § 4, effective June 6.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 248, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

(2) For the short title ("Bond Surety Protection Act") in HB 17-1369, see section 1 of chapter 379, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.